Connecticut, session 2026, SB00256.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes of this
section:
(1) (A) "Private equity entity" means an institutional real estate
investor or an entity that receives funding from an institutional real
estate investor for the purchase of a single-family residence or two-
family residence. A loan provided in exchange for a mortgage of the
residence that is being purchased is not considered funding for the
purposes of this subdivision, provided such mortgage is of a type for
which members of the general public may apply.
(B) "Private equity entity" does not include: (i) An organization which
is described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or
any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United
States, as amended from time to time, and exempt from tax under
Section 501(a) of said Internal Revenue Code, or (ii) a housing land trust
program described in sections 8-214b to 8-214e, inclusive, of the general
statutes.
(2) "Institutional real estate investor" means an entity or combined
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 256
group that: (A) Owns ten or more single-family residences or two-
family residences; (B) manages or receives funds pooled from investors
and acts as a fiduciary with respect to one or more investors; and (C) has
thirty million dollars or more in net value or assets under its
management on any day during the taxable year. An entity is
considered to own a single-family residence or two-family residence if
it directly owns the single-family residence or two-family residence or
indirectly owns ten per cent or more of the single-family residence or
two-family residence.
(3) "Single-family residence" does not include: (A) Any single-family
residence that is to be used as the principal residence of any person who
has an ownership interest in the private equity entity that seeks to
purchase the single-family residence; or (B) any single-family residence
constructed, acquired or operated with federal, state or municipal
appropriated funds.
(4) "Two-family residence" does not include: (A) Any two-family
residence in which one of the dwelling units is to be used as the principal
residence of any person who has an ownership interest in the private
equity entity that seeks to purchase the two-family residence; or (B) any
two-family residence constructed, acquired or operated with federal,
state or municipal appropriated funds.
(b) (1) No private equity entity may purchase, acquire or offer to
purchase or acquire any interest in a single-family residence or two-
family residence unless the single-family residence or two-family
residence has been listed for sale to the general public for at least ninety
days.
(2) The ninety-day waiting period set forth in subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall restart if the seller changes the asking price for the
single-family residence or two-family residence, and a private equity
entity shall be prohibited from purchasing, acquiring or offering to
purchase or acquire any interest in the single-family residence or two-
family residence until it has been listed for sale to the general public at
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 256
the new asking price for at least an additional ninety days.
(3) A private equity entity seeking to purchase a single-family or two-
family residence shall be required to submit to the seller, or anyone
acting as an agent for such seller, prior to the finalizing of such purchase,
a written notice signed by the purchaser stating the following: (A) The
purchaser is a private equity entity; (B) private equity entities are
required to wait until a single-family residence or two-family residence
has been listed for sale for the general public to purchase for at least
ninety days before purchasing, acquiring or offering to purchase or
acquire any interest in the single-family residence or two-family
residence; and (C) such private equity entity has complied with the
provisions of this section.
(c) Any private equity entity that violates the provisions of this
section may be subject to civil damages and penalties in an amount not
exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(d) The Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the
state seeking injunctive relief, declaratory relief, civil damages and civil
penalties against any private equity entity that violates the provisions
of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subsec. (b)(3) was reworded for clarity.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3